Mississippi, session 2026, HB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 93-1-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-1-17.  Any minister of the gospel ordained according to the rules of his church or society, in good standing; any Rabbi or other spiritual leader of any other religious body authorized under the rules of such religious body to solemnize rites of matrimony and being in good standing; any judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, circuit court, chancery court or county court; any retired judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, circuit court, chancery court or county court may solemnize the rites of matrimony between any persons anywhere within this state who shall produce a license granted as herein directed. Justice court judges and members of the boards of supervisors may likewise solemnize the rites of matrimony within their respective counties.  Any marriages performed by a mayor of a municipality prior to March 14, 1994, are valid provided such marriages satisfy the requirements of Section 93-1-18. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.